Utah statutes.
55-12-113.   Article 13 -- Binding effect of compact and other laws.
(1)  Section A.  Other Laws
(a)  Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a compacting
state that is not inconsistent with this compact.
(b)  All compacting states' laws other than state constitutions and other
interstate compacts conflicting with this compact are superseded to the extent
of the conflict.
(2)  Section B.  Binding Effect of the Compact
(a)  All lawful actions of the commission, including all rules and by-laws
promulgated by the commission, are binding upon the compacting states.
(b)  All agreements between the commission and the compacting states are
binding in accordance with their terms.
(c)  Upon the request of a party to a conflict over meaning or interpretation
of commission actions, and upon a majority vote of the compacting states, the
commission may issue advisory opinions regarding the meaning or
interpretation.
(d)  In the event any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional
limits imposed on the legislature of any compacting state, the obligations,
duties, powers, or jurisdiction sought to be conferred by the provision upon
the commission shall be ineffective and the obligations, duties, powers, or
jurisdiction shall remain in the compacting state and shall be exercised by
the agency thereof to which the obligations, duties, powers, or jurisdiction
are delegated by law in effect at the time this compact becomes effective.
